Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 3 Water Rights; Administration and Control

Cross references. —

As to irrigation and water rights, see Wyo. Const. art. 8.

As to contamination of streams by sawmills and mining operations, see §

35-4-202

.

As to disposal of garbage, refuse, and dead animals into state waters, see §§

35-10-101

and

35-10-102

.

Library references. —

18 Nat. Resources & Env't Law Review 19.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d Waters § 1 et seq.

93 C.J.S. Waters § 1 et seq.